Connecticut, session 2026, SB00309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1.Subsection (c) of section 10-76g of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) (1) Commencing with the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and for
each fiscal year thereafter, within available appropriations, each town
whose ratio of [(1)] (A) net costs of special education, as defined in
subsection (h) of section 10-76f, for the fiscal year prior to the year in
which the grant is to be paid to [(2)] (B) the product of its total need
students, as defined in section 10-262f, and the average regular program
expenditures, as defined in section 10-262f, per need student for all
towns for such year exceeds the state-wide average for all such ratios
shall be eligible to receive a supplemental special education grant. Such
grant shall be equal to the product of a town's eligible excess costs and
LCO No. 1874 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 309
the town's base aid ratio, as defined in section 10-262f, provided each
town's grant shall be adjusted proportionately if necessary to stay
within the appropriation. Payment pursuant to this subsection shall be
made in June. For purposes of this subsection, a town's eligible excess
costs are the difference between its net costs of special education and the
amount the town would have expended if it spent at the state-wide
average rate.
(2) Commencing with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and for
each fiscal year thereafter, within available appropriations, the State
Board of Education shall pay a contingency special education grant to a
local or regional board of education on a current basis for any costs in
excess of two times the net current expenditures for each student who
enrolls in the school district or becomes ineligible for birth-to-three
services on or after March first of the school year and requires special
education or related services.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) On and after July 1, 2026, the State
Board of Education shall not approve a private provider of special
education services, as defined in section 10-91g of the general statutes,
that is owned or operated by a private equity company. As used in this
section, "private equity company" means an asset class consisting of
equity securities and debt in operating companies that are not publicly
traded on a stock exchange.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Education
shall convene a working group to consider and make recommendations
concerning (1) innovations in the provision of special education and
related services through public-private partnerships, such as through
the creation of research and development schools and the inclusion of
neuropsychological services in a child's individualized education
program, and (2) expansion of the eligibility requirements for who may
be approved as a private provider of special education services, as
defined in section 10-91g of the general statutes. The commissioner shall
select the members of the working group, provided at least one member
LCO No. 1874 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 309
is a representative from an approved private provider of special
education services and at least one member is a representative from a
private provider of special education services that is ineligible to be
approved by the State Board of Education. Not later than January 1,
2027, the working group shall submit a report on its findings and any
recommendations to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section